North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-32 Penalties and Sentencing
12.1-32-07.
Supervision of probationer — Conditions of probation — Revocation.

When the court imposes probation upon conviction for a felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-09.1 or 12.1-32-02.1, a second or subsequent violation of section 12.1-17-07.1, a second or subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection order, a violation of chapter 12.1-41, a violation of section 14-09-22, or a felony offense under chapter 39-08, the court shall place the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. When the court imposes probation upon conviction or order of disposition in all other felony cases, the court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. In class A misdemeanor cases, the court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or other responsible party. In all other cases, the court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of a community corrections program other than the department of corrections and rehabilitation. A community corrections program means a program for the supervision of a defendant, including monitoring and enforcement of terms and conditions of probation set by the court.

The conditions of probation must be such as the court in its discretion deems reasonably necessary to ensure that the defendant will lead a law-abiding life or to assist the defendant to do so. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every probation that the defendant not commit another offense during the period for which the probation remains subject to revocation. The court shall order supervision costs and fees of not less than fifty-five dollars per month unless the court makes a specific finding on record that the imposition of fees will result in an undue hardship. If the offender has not paid the full amount of supervision fees and costs before completion or termination of probation, the court may issue an order, after opportunity for hearing, to determine the amount of supervision fees and costs that are unpaid. The order may be filed, transcribed, and enforced by the department of corrections and rehabilitation in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by a district court of this state.

The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every probation that the defendant may not possess a firearm, destructive device, or other dangerous weapon while the defendant is on probation. Except when the offense is a misdemeanor offense under section 12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-01.1, 12.1-17-01.2, 12.1-17-05, or 12.1-17-07.1, or chapter 14-07.1, the court may waive this condition of probation if the defendant has pled guilty to, or has been found guilty of, a misdemeanor or infraction offense, the misdemeanor or infraction is the defendant’s first offense, and the court has made a specific finding on the record before imposition of a sentence or a probation that there is good cause to waive the condition. The court may not waive this condition of probation if the court places the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of probation that the defendant may not willfully defraud a urine test administered as a condition of probation. Unless waived on the record by the court, the court shall also provide as a condition of probation that the defendant undergo various agreed-to community constraints and conditions as intermediate measures of the department of corrections and rehabilitation to avoid revocation, which may include:

Community service;

Day reporting;

Curfew;

Home confinement;

House arrest;

Electronic monitoring;

Residential halfway house;

Intensive supervision program;

Up to five nonsuccessive periods of incarceration during any twelve-month period, each of which may not exceed forty-eight consecutive hours;

Participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program; or

One period of incarceration during a period of probation not to exceed thirty consecutive days in lieu of a petition for revocation of probation.

When imposing a sentence to probation, probation in conjunction with imprisonment, or probation in conjunction with suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence, the court may impose such conditions as it deems appropriate and may include any one or more of the following:

Work faithfully at a suitable employment or faithfully pursue a course of study or of career and technical education training that will equip the defendant for suitable employment.

Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and remain in a specified institution if required for that purpose.

Attend or reside in a facility established for the instruction, recreation, or residence of persons on probation.

Support the defendant’s dependents and meet other family responsibilities.

Make restitution or reparation to the victim of the defendant’s conduct for the damage or injury which was sustained or perform other reasonable assigned work. When restitution, reparation, or assigned work is a condition of probation, the court shall proceed as provided in subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, of section 12.1-32-08.

Pay a fine imposed after consideration of the provisions of section 12.1-32-05.

Refrain from excessive use of alcohol or any use of narcotics or of another dangerous or abusable drug without a prescription.

Permit the probation officer to visit the defendant at reasonable times at the defendant’s home or elsewhere.

Remain within the jurisdiction of the court, unless granted permission to leave by the court or the probation officer.

Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify the probation officer of any change in address or employment.

Report to a probation officer at reasonable times as directed by the court or the probation officer.

Submit to a medical examination or other reasonable testing for the purpose of determining the defendant’s use of narcotics, marijuana, or other controlled substance whenever required by a probation officer.

Refrain from associating with known users or traffickers in narcotics, marijuana, or other controlled substances.

Submit the defendant’s person, place of residence, or vehicle to search and seizure by a probation officer at any time of the day or night, with or without a search warrant.

Serve a term of imprisonment of up to one-half of the maximum term authorized for the offense of which the defendant was convicted.

Reimburse the costs and expenses determined necessary for the defendant’s adequate defense when counsel is appointed or provided at public expense for the defendant. When reimbursement of indigent defense costs and expenses is imposed as a condition of probation, the court shall proceed as provided in subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-08.

Provide community service for the number of hours designated by the court.

Refrain from any subscription to, access to, or use of the internet.

When the court imposes a sentence to probation, probation in conjunction with imprisonment, or probation in conjunction with suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence, the defendant must be given a certificate explicitly setting forth the conditions on which the defendant is being released.

The court, upon notice to the probationer and with good cause, may modify or enlarge the conditions of probation at any time before the expiration or termination of the period for which the probation remains conditional. If the defendant violates a condition of probation at any time before the expiration or termination of the period, the court may continue the defendant on the existing probation, with or without modifying or enlarging the conditions, or may revoke the probation and impose any other sentence that was available under section 12.1-32-02 or 12.1-32-09 at the time of initial sentencing or deferment.

The court may continue or modify probation conditions or revoke probation for a violation of probation conditions occurring before the expiration or termination of the period of probation notwithstanding that the order of the court is imposed after the expiration or termination has occurred. The petition for revocation must be issued within sixty days of the expiration or termination of probation.

Jurisdiction over a probationer may be transferred from the court that imposed the sentence to another court of this state with the concurrence of both courts. Retransfers of jurisdiction may also occur in the same manner. The court to which jurisdiction has been transferred under this subsection may exercise all powers permissible under this chapter over the defendant.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may authorize the defendant to assist law enforcement officers in an investigation of a criminal offense upon the terms and conditions as the court may require by written order. The court shall hold a hearing in camera before issuing an order under this subsection. The order must be sealed and is subject to inspection only upon order of the court.

The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall provide written notice to a defendant who is in the department’s physical custody of any untried petition for revocation against the defendant of which the department has notice and of the defendant’s right to make a request for final disposition of the petition.

Upon notice of an untried petition for revocation of probation, the defendant may request final disposition of the petition. The defendant’s request must be in writing and name the court in which the petition for revocation of probation is pending and the prosecuting official charged with the duty of prosecuting the petition.

The defendant shall submit the request to the department. The department shall certify the term of commitment under which the defendant is being held, the time the defendant has served on the sentence, the time remaining to be served, sentence reduction credit the defendant has earned, the defendant’s eligibility for parole, and whether the parole board has made a decision regarding the defendant’s parole.

The department shall send by registered mail, return receipt requested, one copy of the request and certificate to the court and one copy to the prosecuting official to whom the request and certificate is addressed.

The petition for revocation of probation must be brought to the court for hearing within ninety days after the receipt of the request and certificate by the court and prosecuting official. If the petition is not brought to the court for hearing within the ninety days, the court shall dismiss the petition with prejudice.

The parties may stipulate for a continuance or the court may grant a continuance upon a showing of good cause by either party for a petition under this subsection.

If the defendant escapes from custody subsequent to the defendant’s execution of a request for final disposition of a petition for revocation, the request is considered void.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1989, ch. 158, § 4; 1991, ch. 134, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 114, § 3; 1993, ch. 130, § 1; 1993, ch. 131, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 138, § 1; 1997, ch. 133, § 1; 1999, ch. 16, § 6; 1999, ch. 124, § 2; 2001, ch. 130, § 2; 2001, ch. 133, § 3; 2001, ch. 139, § 1; 2003, ch. 112, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 9; 2005, ch. 43, § 8; 2005, ch. 113, § 2; 2007, ch. 15, § 5; 2007, ch. 119, § 3; 2007, ch. 135, § 1; 2009, ch. 469, § 2; 2013, ch. 46, § 7; 2013, ch. 112, § 1; 2013, ch. 111, § 1; 2015, ch. 114, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 8, effective January 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 118, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 107, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 111, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

12.1-32-07.1.
Release, discharge, or termination of probation.

Whenever a person has been placed on probation and in the judgment of the court that person has satisfactorily met the conditions of probation, the court shall cause to be issued to the person a final discharge from further supervision.

Whenever a person has been placed on probation pursuant to subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02, the court at any time, when the ends of justice will be served, and when reformation of the probationer warrants, may terminate the period of probation and discharge the person so held. A person convicted of gross sexual imposition under subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03 is not entitled to early termination of probation pursuant to this section, unless the court finds after at least eight years of supervised probation that further supervision would impose a manifest injustice. Every defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of probation for the entire period, or who has been discharged from probation prior to termination of the probation period, may at any time be permitted in the discretion of the court to withdraw the defendant’s plea of guilty. The court may in its discretion set aside the verdict of guilty. In either case, the court may dismiss the information or indictment against the defendant. The court may, upon its own motion or upon application by the defendant and before dismissing the information or indictment, reduce to a misdemeanor a felony conviction for which the plea of guilty has been withdrawn or set aside. The defendant must then be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime of which the defendant has been convicted except as provided by sections 12.1-32-15 and 62.1-02-01.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 158, § 5; 2007, ch. 123, § 5; 2015, ch. 116, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

12.1-32-07.2.
Records and filing of papers.

Whenever the court orders that a person convicted of a felony is to be placed on probation, the clerk of the court in which the order is entered immediately shall make full copies of the judgment or order of the court with the conditions of probation and shall certify the same to the director of parole and probation of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. Upon the disposition of any criminal case, the clerk of court shall transmit to the department of corrections and rehabilitation statistical data, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, regarding all defendants whether found guilty or discharged.

Whenever imposition of sentence is deferred and, pursuant to section 12.1-32-07.1, the plea of guilty is withdrawn by the defendant or the verdict of guilty is set aside by the court, the clerk of court shall file all papers, including the findings and final orders in proceedings under section 12.1-32-07.1, and shall note the date of filing on the papers. The records and papers are subject to examination by the clerk, a judge of the court, the juvenile commissioner, probation officers, the defendant or defendant’s counsel, and the state’s attorney. Others may examine the records and papers only upon the written order of a judge of the court.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 158, § 6; 1991, ch. 135, § 1.

12.1-32-07.3.
When probationer deemed escapee and fugitive from justice.

A probationer is considered an escapee and a fugitive from justice if the probationer leaves the jurisdiction before the expiration of the probationary period without permission of the court or the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 158. § 7; 1991, ch. 135, § 2.

12.1-32-07.4.
Presumptive probation.

The sentencing court shall sentence an individual who has pled guilty to, or has been found guilty of, a class C felony offense or class A misdemeanor offense to a term of probation at the time of initial sentencing, except for an offense involving domestic violence; an offense subject to registration under section 12.1-32-15; an offense involving a firearm or dangerous weapon, explosive, or incendiary device; or if a mandatory term of incarceration is required by law.

The sentencing court may impose a sentence of imprisonment if the sentencing court finds there are aggravating factors present to justify a departure from presumptive probation. Aggravating factors include:

That the individual has plead guilty to, or has been found guilty of, a felony offense or class A misdemeanor offense prior to the date of the commission of the offense or offenses charged in the complaint, information, or indictment;

The age and vulnerability of the victim, whether the individual was in a position of responsibility or trust over the victim, or whether the individual abused a public position of responsibility or trust; or

If the individual used threats or coercion in the commission of the offense.

This section does not preclude the sentencing court from deferring imposition of sentence in accordance with subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02 or sentencing an individual to a term of incarceration with credit for time spent in custody if execution of the sentence is suspended.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 108, § 9, effective January 1, 2018.

12.1-32-08.
Hearing prior to ordering restitution, reparation, or reimbursement of indigent defense costs and expenses — Conditions — Collection of restitution for insufficient funds checks — Continuing appropriation.

Before imposing restitution or reparation as a sentence or condition of probation, the court shall hold a hearing on the matter with notice to the prosecuting attorney and to the defendant as to the nature and amount of restitution. The court, when sentencing a person adjudged guilty of criminal activities that have resulted in pecuniary damages, in addition to any other sentence the court may impose, shall order that the defendant make restitution to the victim or other recipient as determined by the court. Restitution must include payment to the owner of real property that is contaminated by the defendant in the manufacturing of methamphetamine for the cost of removing the contamination and returning the property to the property’s condition before contamination and to any other person that has incurred costs in decontaminating the property. In determining the amount of restitution, the court shall take into account the reasonable damages sustained by the victim or victims of the criminal offense, which damages are limited to those directly related to the criminal offense and expenses actually incurred as a direct result of the defendant’s criminal action. This can include an amount equal to the cost of necessary and related professional services and devices relating to physical, psychiatric, and psychological care. The defendant may be required as part of the sentence imposed by the court to pay the prescribed treatment costs for a victim of a sexual offense as defined in chapters 12.1-20 and 12.1-27.2. The court shall fix the amount of restitution or reparation and shall fix the manner of performance of any condition or conditions of probation established pursuant to this subsection. The court shall order restitution be paid to the division of adult services for any benefits the division has paid or may pay under chapter 54-23.4 unless the court, on the record, directs otherwise. Any payments made pursuant to the order must be deducted from damages awarded in a civil action arising from the same incident. An order that a defendant make restitution or reparation as a sentence or condition of probation may, unless the court directs otherwise, be filed without filing fee, transcribed, and enforced by the person entitled to the restitution or reparation or by the division of adult services in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by the courts of this state may be enforced. Upon thirty days’ written notice to the victim’s last known address, the court may order the judgment imposing a duty to pay restitution or reparation be docketed in the same manner as a civil judgment under section 29-26-22.1.

When the restitution ordered by the court under subsection 1 is the result of a finding that the defendant issued a check or draft without sufficient funds or without an account, the court shall impose as costs the greater of the sum of ten dollars or an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount of restitution ordered. The costs imposed under this subsection, however, may not exceed one thousand dollars. The state-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit in the restitution collection assistance fund. The funds deposited into the restitution collection assistance fund are appropriated to the judicial branch on a continuing basis for the purpose of defraying expenses incident to the collection of restitution, including operating expenses and the compensation of additional necessary personnel. The state’s attorneys and county-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under this subsection to the county treasurer to be deposited in the county general fund.

The court may order the defendant to perform reasonable assigned work as a condition of probation, which assigned work need not be related to the offense charged, but must not be solely for the benefit of a private individual other than the victim.

Under section 12.1-32-07, the court may order that the defendant reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses as a condition of probation. Unless it finds that there is no likelihood that the defendant is or will be able to pay attorney’s fees and expenses, the court, in its judgment of conviction, and in any order or amended judgment following a revocation or other postjudgment proceeding, shall notify the defendant, the defendant’s probation officer, and the prosecuting attorney of the presumed amount of costs and expenses to be reimbursed, as determined by the commission on legal counsel for indigents, and of the right to a hearing on the reimbursement amount. The reimbursement amount must include an application fee imposed under section 29-07-01.1 if the fee has not been paid before disposition of the case and the court has not waived payment of the fee. If the defendant or prosecutor requests a hearing within thirty days of receiving notice under this subdivision, the court shall schedule a hearing at which the actual amount of attorney’s fees and expenses must be shown. In determining the amount and method of reimbursement, the court shall consider the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that reimbursement of costs and expenses will impose.

A defendant who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses as a condition of probation and who is not willfully in default in that reimbursement may at any time petition the court that imposed the condition to waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the costs and expenses. If the court is satisfied that reimbursement of the amount due will impose undue hardship on the defendant or the defendant’s immediate family, the court may waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the amount due or modify the method of payment.

If at any time the court finds that the defendant is able to reimburse costs and expenses and has willfully failed to do so, the court may continue, modify, or enlarge the conditions of probation or revoke probation as provided in subsection 6 or 7, as applicable, of section 12.1-32-07.

If the court finds that the defendant is unable to pay a fine, supervision fee, reimbursement for indigent defense costs and expenses, or restitution or reparations, the court may order the defendant to perform reasonable assigned work in lieu of all or part of a fine, a supervision fee, reimbursement for indigent defense costs and expenses, or restitution or reparations. The defendant may not perform reasonable assigned work in lieu of restitution or reparations unless the person entitled to restitution or reparations has consented in writing or on the record.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, § 29; 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1993, ch. 132, § 3; 1997, ch. 133, § 2; 1997, ch. 134, § 1; 2001, ch. 41, § 11; 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2003, ch. 112, § 3; 2005, ch. 120, § 1; 2007, ch. 119, § 4; 2009, ch. 112, § 2; 2019, ch. 117, § 2, effective April 9, 2019; 2019, ch. 270, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

County and state offices performing restitution collection and enforcement activities, see N.D.C.C. § 11-16-01.1.

12.1-32-09.
Dangerous special offenders — Habitual offenders — Extended sentences — Procedure.

A court may sentence a convicted offender to an extended sentence as a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender in accordance with this section upon a finding of any one or more of the following:

The convicted offender is a dangerous, mentally abnormal person whose conduct has been characterized by persistent aggressive behavior and the behavior makes the offender a serious danger to other persons.

The convicted offender is a professional criminal who has substantial income or resources derived from criminal activity.

The convicted offender is a habitual offender. The court may not make such a finding unless the offender is an adult and has previously been convicted in any state or states or by the United States of two felonies of class C or above committed at different times when the offender was an adult. For the purposes of this subdivision, a felony conviction in another state or under the laws of the United States is considered a felony of class C or above if it is punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of five years or more.

The offender was convicted of an offense that seriously endangered the life of another person and the offender had previously been convicted of a similar offense.

The offender is especially dangerous because the offender used a firearm, dangerous weapon, or destructive device in the commission of the offense or during the flight therefrom.

The extended sentence may be imposed in the following manner:

If the offense for which the offender is convicted is a class A felony, the court may impose a sentence up to a maximum of life imprisonment.

If the offense for which the offender is convicted is a class B felony, the court may impose a sentence up to a maximum of imprisonment for twenty years.

If the offense for which the offender is convicted is a class C felony, the court may impose a sentence up to a maximum of imprisonment for ten years.

Whenever an attorney charged with the prosecution of a defendant in a court of this state for an alleged felony committed when the defendant was over the age of eighteen years has reason to believe that the defendant is a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender, the attorney, at a reasonable time before trial or acceptance by the court of a plea of guilty, may sign and file with the court, and may amend, a notice specifying that the defendant is a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender who upon conviction for the felony is subject to the imposition of a sentence under subsection 2, and setting out with particularity the reasons why the attorney believes the defendant to be a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender. In no case may the fact that the prosecuting attorney is seeking sentencing of the defendant as a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender be disclosed to the jury before a verdict. If the court finds that the filing of the notice as a public record may prejudice fair consideration of a pending criminal matter, the court may order the notice sealed and the notice is not subject to subpoena or public inspection during the pendency of the criminal matter, except on order of the court, but is subject to inspection by the defendant alleged to be a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender and the offender’s counsel.

Upon any plea of guilty, or verdict or finding of guilt of the defendant of such felony, a hearing must be held, before sentence is imposed, in accordance with this subsection as follows:

By a jury, or the court if a jury is waived by the defendant, if the notice alleges that the defendant is a dangerous special offender under subdivision a, b, d, or e of subsection 1. The jury, or the court if a jury is waived, must find that the defendant is a dangerous special offender under one or more of these subdivisions by proof beyond a reasonable doubt. However, in the case of a notice alleging only subdivision e of subsection 1, the trial jury, or the trial court if a jury is waived, may make a special finding of proof of this subdivision without an additional hearing subsequent to a verdict or finding of guilt.

By the court if the notice alleges that the defendant is a habitual offender under subdivision c of subsection 1. The court must find that the defendant is a habitual offender by a preponderance of the evidence.

Except in the most extraordinary cases, the court shall obtain a presentence report and may receive a diagnostic testing report under subsection 5 of section 12.1-32-02 before holding a hearing under this subsection. The court shall fix a time for the hearing and notice thereof must be given to the defendant and the prosecution at least five days prior thereto. The court shall permit the prosecution and counsel for the defendant, or the defendant if the defendant is not represented by counsel, to inspect the presentence report sufficiently before the hearing as to afford a reasonable opportunity for verification. In extraordinary cases, the court may withhold material not relevant to a proper sentence, diagnostic opinion that might seriously disrupt a program of rehabilitation, any source of information obtained on a promise of confidentiality, and material previously disclosed in open court. A court withholding all or part of a presentence report shall inform the parties of its action and place in the record the reasons therefor. The court may require parties inspecting all or part of a presentence report to give notice of any part thereof intended to be controverted. In connection with the hearing, the defendant is entitled to compulsory process and cross-examination of such witnesses as appear at the hearing. A duly authenticated copy of a former judgment or commitment is prima facie evidence of such former judgment or commitment. If the jury or the court finds, after hearing, one or more of the grounds set forth in subsection 1, that the defendant is a dangerous special offender or a habitual offender, the court shall sentence the defendant to imprisonment for an appropriate term within the limits specified in subsection 2.

A conviction shown on direct or collateral review or at the hearing to be invalid or for which the offender has been pardoned on the ground of innocence must be disregarded for purposes of subdivision c. In support of findings under subdivision b, it may be shown that the offender has had control of income or property not explained as derived from a source other than criminal activity. For purposes of subdivision b, a substantial source of income means a source of income which for any period of one year or more exceeds the minimum wage, determined on the basis of a forty-hour week and a fifty-week year, without reference to exceptions, under section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, for an employee engaged in commerce or in the production of goods for commerce, and which for the same period exceeds fifty percent of the offender’s declared adjusted gross income under chapter 57-38.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, § 30; 1977, ch. 128, § 1; 1989, ch. 158, § 8; 1995, ch. 136, § 4; 2001, ch. 214, § 1.

Note.

Section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 referenced above is compiled at 29 USCS § 206(a)(1).

12.1-32-09.1.
Sentencing of violent offenders.

Except as provided under section 12-48.1-02 and pursuant to rules adopted by the department of corrections and rehabilitation, an offender who is convicted of a crime in violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, subsection 2 of section 12.1-17-02, section 12.1-18-01, subdivision a of subsection 1 or subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 12.1-20-03, section 12.1-22-01, subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 12.1-22-02, or an attempt to commit the offenses, and who receives a sentence of imprisonment is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis until eighty-five percent of the sentence imposed by the court has been served or the sentence is commuted.

In the case of an offender who is sentenced to a term of life imprisonment with opportunity for parole under subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-01, the term “sentence imposed” means the remaining life expectancy of the offender on the date of sentencing. The remaining life expectancy of the offender must be calculated on the date of sentencing, computed by reference to a recognized mortality table as established by rule by the supreme court.

Notwithstanding this section, an offender sentenced under subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-01 may not be eligible for parole until the requirements of that subsection have been met.

An offender who is convicted of a class C felony in violation of section 12.1-17-02, or an attempt to commit the offense, and who has received a sentence of imprisonment or a sentence of imprisonment upon revocation of probation before August 1, 2015, is eligible to have the offender’s sentence considered by the parole board.

Notwithstanding subsection 4, this section does not apply to a sentence imposed upon revocation of probation.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 136, § 5; 1997, ch. 135, § 1; 2011, ch. 101, § 3; 2015, ch. 104, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 119, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 119, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies retroactively to judgments of conviction for offenses subject to section 12.1-32-09.1 entered after July 31, 1995.”

12.1-32-10.
Mandatory parole components. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 51, § 5.

12.1-32-11.
Merger of sentences — Sentencing for multiple offenses.

Unless the court otherwise orders, when a person serving a term of commitment imposed by a court of this state is committed for another offense or offenses, the shorter term or the shorter remaining term shall be merged in the other term. When a person on probation or parole for an offense committed in this state is sentenced for another offense or offenses, the period still to be served on probation or parole shall be merged in any new sentence of commitment or probation. A court merging sentences under this subsection shall forthwith furnish each of the other courts previously involved and the penal facility in which the defendant is confined under sentence with authenticated copies of its sentence, which shall cite the sentences being merged. A court which imposed a sentence which is merged pursuant to this subsection shall modify such sentence in accordance with the effect of the merger.

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 129, § 1.

When sentenced only for misdemeanors, a defendant may not be consecutively sentenced to more than one year, except that a defendant being sentenced for two or more class A misdemeanors may be subject to an aggregate maximum not exceeding that authorized by section 12.1-32-01 for a class C felony if each class A misdemeanor was committed as part of a different course of conduct or each involved a substantially different criminal objective.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, § 31; 1977, ch. 129, § 1.

12.1-32-12.
Penalties, sentences, and parole for offenses unclassified and in other titles.

Where an offense is defined by a statute or by the constitution without specification of its classification pursuant to section 12.1-32-01, the offense is punishable as provided in the statute or constitutional provision defining it, or:

If the offense is declared to be a felony, without further specification of punishment, it is punishable as if it were a class C felony.

If the offense is declared to be a misdemeanor, without further specification of punishment, it is punishable as if it were a class A misdemeanor.

The sentencing alternatives available under section 12.1-32-02 are available to a court sentencing an offender for commission of an offense defined by a statute outside this title.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, § 32; 1989, ch. 51, § 3.

Cross-References.

Property forfeiture, see N.D.C.C. ch. 29-31.1.

Corporate criminal responsibility, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-03-02.

Fines and penalties imposed by city, limited, see N.D.C.C. § 40-05-06.

Title registration for motor vehicles, general penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 39-05-33.

12.1-32-13.
Minor convicted of felony — Sentencing.

Whenever a minor is convicted of a felony, the sentencing court may commit the person to the North Dakota youth correctional center as provided in this title. Provided, however, that a minor over the age of sixteen who is convicted of a felony may be sentenced to a penal institution or detention facility.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1981, ch. 328, § 3; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.

Collateral References.

Consideration of accused’s juvenile court record in sentencing for offense committed as adult, 64 A.L.R.3d 1291.